North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 1. Nursing Home Licensure Act.
§ 131E-114.2.
Use of medication aides to perform technical aspects of medication administration.

Facilities licensed and medication administration services provided under this Part may utilize medication aides to perform the technical aspects of medication administration consistent with G.S. 90-171.20(7) and (8), and G.S. 90-171.43.

A medication aide who is employed in a facility licensed under Article 5 and Article 6, Part 1 of this Chapter shall be listed as a Nurse Aide I on the Nurse Aide I Registry in addition to being listed on the Medication Aide Registry.

Medication administration as used in Article 5 and Article 6, Part 1 of this Chapter shall not include intravenous or injectable medication services.

The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted by the Commission shall include:

Training and competency evaluation of medication aides as provided for under this section.

Requirements for listing under the Medication Aide Registry as provided for under

G.S. 131E-270

.

Requirements for supervision of medication aides by licensed health professionals or appropriately qualified supervisory personnel consistent with this Part.

History.

2005-276, s. 10.40C(a); 2007-444, s. 4(a).

§ 131E-114.3.
Smoking prohibited inside long-term care facilities; penalty.

Except to the extent otherwise provided by federal law, smoking is prohibited inside long-term care facilities. As used in this section:

“Long-term care facilities” include adult care homes, nursing homes, skilled nursing facilities, facilities licensed under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, and other licensed facilities that provide long-term care services.

“Smoking” means the use or possession of any lighted cigar, cigarette, pipe, or other lighted smoking product.

“Inside” means a fully enclosed area.

The person who owns, manages, operates, or otherwise controls a long-term care facility where smoking is prohibited under this section shall:

Conspicuously post signs clearly stating that smoking is prohibited inside the facility. The signs may include the international “No Smoking” symbol, which consists of a pictorial representation of a burning cigarette enclosed in a red circle with a red bar across it.

Direct any person who is smoking inside the facility to extinguish the lighted smoking product.

Provide written notice to individuals upon admittance that smoking is prohibited inside the facility and obtain the signature of the individual or the individual’s representative acknowledging receipt of the notice.

The Department may impose an administrative penalty not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each violation on any person who owns, manages, operates, or otherwise controls the long-term care facility and fails to comply with subsection (b) of this section. A violation of this section constitutes a civil offense only and is not a crime.

History.

2007-459, s. 2.

§ 131E-114.4.
Examination and screening for the presence of controlled substances required for applicants for employment in nursing homes.

An offer of employment by a nursing home licensed under this Part to an applicant is conditioned on the applicant’s consent to an examination and screening for controlled substances. The examination and screening shall be conducted in accordance with Article 20 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes. A screening procedure that utilizes a single-use test device may be used for the examination and screening of applicants and may be administered on-site. If the results of the applicant’s examination and screening indicate the presence of a controlled substance, the nursing home shall not employ the applicant unless and until the applicant provides to the nursing home written verification from the applicant’s prescribing physician that every controlled substance identified by the examination and screening is prescribed by that physician to treat the applicant’s medical or psychological condition. The verification from the physician shall include the name of the controlled substance, the prescribed dosage and frequency, and the condition for which the substance is prescribed. If the result of an applicant’s or employee’s examination and screening indicates the presence of a controlled substance, the nursing home may require a second examination and screening to verify the results of the prior examination and screening.

A nursing home may require random examination and screening for controlled substances as a condition of continued employment. If the nursing home has reasonable grounds to believe that an employee is an abuser of a controlled substance, the nursing home may require that employee to undergo examination and screening for controlled substances as a condition of continued employment.

A nursing home and an officer or employee of a nursing home that, in good faith, comply with this section are not liable for the failure of the nursing home to employ or continue the employment of an individual on the basis of the results of an examination and screening of the applicant or employee for controlled substances.

An entity and officers and employees of an entity that perform controlled substance examination and screening in accordance with Article 20 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes shall be immune from civil liability for conducting or failing to conduct the examination and screening if the examination and screening are requested and received in compliance with this section and with Article 20 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes.

The results of an examination and screening conducted at the request of a nursing home in accordance with this section are confidential and not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. The nursing home shall maintain the confidentiality of all information related to the examination and screening of an applicant for employment or an individual currently employed by the nursing home.

The nursing home shall pay expenses related to controlled substance examination and screening pursuant to this section, except examinee-requested retests. The examinee shall pay all reasonable expenses for retests of confirmed positive results.

History.

2013-167, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to examination and screening for the presence of controlled substances required for applicants for employment in adult care homes, see

G.S. 131D-45

.